Arkansas, session 2025, HB1548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-4-126(b)(7), concerning the duties of
the Chief Data Officer of the Division of Information Systems, is repealed.
(7) Direct and oversee the Data and Transparency Panel.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 25-4-127 is repealed.
25-4-127. Data and Transparency Panel — Creation — Duties.
(a) The Data and Transparency Panel is created within the Department
of Transformation and Shared Services.
(b) The panel shall consist of the following members:
(1)(A) Three (3) appointees from the private sector who shall be
appointed as follows:
(i) One (1) appointee shall be appointed by the
Governor;
(ii) One (1) appointee shall be appointed by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives; and
(iii) One (1) appointee shall be appointed by the
*LGL091*
03-06-2025 09:31:43 LGL091

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 HB1548
President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
(B) Each appointee shall serve at the pleasure of his or
her appointer.
(C) The appointer of an appointee who vacates his or her
position on the panel shall fill the vacancy as required under this section;
(2) The Attorney General or his or her designee;
(3) The secretaries, directors, or their designees, of the
following entities:
(A) The Department of Public Safety;
(B) The Department of Inspector General;
(C) The Department of Education;
(D) The Department of Energy and Environment;
(E) The Department of Corrections;
(F) The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;
(G) The Department of Finance and Administration;
(H) The Department of Health;
(I) The Department of Agriculture;
(J) The Department of Human Services;
(K) The Department of Transformation and Shared Services;
(L) The Department of Labor and Licensing;
(M) The Department of Veteran Affairs;
(N) The Department of the Military; and
(O) The Department of Commerce;
(4)(A) The Chief Data Officer of the Division of Information
Systems.
(B) The Chief Data Officer of the Division of Information
Systems shall be the Chair of the Data and Transparency Panel.
(C) The members of the panel shall select a vice chair
annually;
(5) The Chief Privacy Officer of the Division of Information
Systems; and
(6) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court or his or her
designee.
(c) The panel shall:
(1) Evaluate and identify data to be included in the statewide
data warehouse program;
03-06-2025 09:31:43 LGL091

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 HB1548
(2) Determine and recommend procedures necessary for the
implementation of a statewide data warehouse program;
(3) Oversee a statewide data warehouse program implemented in
this state;
(4) Evaluate and identify data that may be provided to the
public in accordance with data standards and specifications developed by the
Division of Information Systems;
(5) Engage other divisions, boards, and commissions by
soliciting input on information sharing opportunities;
(6) Provide annual reports to the Joint Committee on Advanced
Communications and Information Technology;
(7) Develop a unified longitudinal system that links existing
siloed agency information for education and workforce outcomes to
continuously conduct a business systems assessment to:
(A) Help the leaders of this state and service providers
develop an improved understanding of individual outcomes resulting from
education and workforce pipelines in Arkansas;
(B) Identify opportunities for improvement by using real-
time information; and
(C) Continuously align programs and resources to the
evolving economy of this state; and
(8)(A) Develop a shared services data hub for statewide data
sharing in order to:
(i) Drive innovation and facilitate efficiency
across state agencies;
(ii) Improve the delivery of services; and
(iii) Better serve the residents of this state.
(B) In implementation of the shared services data hub
under subdivision (8)(A) of this section, the Division of Information Systems
shall:
(i)(a) Establish and maintain a program to collect,
analyze, and exchange government information in carrying out the powers and
duties of the executive state agency sharing the data.
(b) In carrying out the program under
subdivision (8)(B)(i)(a) of this section, the Division of Information Systems
may obtain government information from each executive state agency;
03-06-2025 09:31:43 LGL091

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 HB1548
(ii) Establish and maintain a program to make
government information available to executive state agencies, political
subdivisions, educational institutions, researchers, nongovernmental
organizations, and the general public, subject to the following:
(a)(1) A program established and maintained
under this section shall include a policy governing access to government
information held by the Division of Information Systems under this chapter.
(2) Government information may be made
available only if doing so does not violate state or federal confidentiality
and disclosure laws;
(b)(1) The Division of Information Systems is
considered to be an agent of the executive state agency sharing government
information and is an authorized receiver of government information under the
statutory or administrative law that governs the government information
unless:
(A) The Division of Information
Systems or executive state agencies are specifically excluded as an
authorized receiver; or
(B) An authorized receiver of
government information is specifically enumerated under the statutory or
administrative law governing the government information without stated
exceptions or qualifications.
(2) Interagency data sharing under this
section does not constitute a disclosure or release under any statutory or
administrative law that governs the government information;
(c)(1) A program established and maintained
under this section shall prescribe a form to be used to memorialize the
sharing of data under this section.
(2) The form required under subdivision
(8)(B)(ii)(c)(1) of this section shall be signed by the administrative head
of the executive state agency so long as the form does not require the
sharing of state agency information that would be in contradiction of
existing state or federal law; and
(d)(1) A data sharing form completed and
signed under subdivision (8)(B)(ii)(c)(1) of this section constitutes the
agreement required by any statutory or administrative law that governs the
03-06-2025 09:31:43 LGL091

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 HB1548
data.
(2) Additional documentation is not
required to share data under this section;
(iii) Establish privacy and quality policy for
government information that complies with all applicable Arkansas and federal
laws, rules, and policies;
(iv) According to standards developed by the state
security office, establish and maintain a program to ensure the security of
government information under this section; and
(v) Establish a public portal that will provide
Arkansans with easy access to data.
(d)(1) The panel shall meet at least quarterly in each calendar year
at a time and place determined by the panel.
(2) Special meetings may be called at the discretion of the
chair.
(e) Nine (9) members of the panel shall constitute a quorum to
transact the business of the panel.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 25-4-128 is repealed.
25-4-128. Data and Transparency Panel — Records — Confidentiality.
(a) All records, reports, and other information obtained by the Data
and Transparency Panel shall be confidential unless approved for publication
in accordance with data standards and specifications developed by the
Division of Information Systems.
(b) A person, agency, or entity that furnishes confidential
information in good faith under this chapter is immune from criminal or civil
liability arising out of the release of the confidential information.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 4, is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
25-4-130. Statewide data integration and exchange.
(a) The Division of Information Systems shall:
(1) Oversee a statewide data program;
(2) Evaluate and identify data that may be provided to the
public in accordance with data standards and specifications developed by the
Division of Information Systems;
03-06-2025 09:31:43 LGL091

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 HB1548
(3) Engage other departments, divisions, boards, and commissions
soliciting input on information sharing opportunities;
(4) Obtain state information from each cabinet-level department
and be considered an agent, authorized representative, and authorized
receiver of the cabinet-level department;
(5) Maintain and enhance a statewide longitudinal data system
that links existing state information to:
(A) Facilitate an improved understanding of individual
outcomes;
(B) Identify opportunities for improvement; and
(C) Continuously align programs and resources;
(6) Maintain and enhance a statewide shared services data hub
for data sharing to link state information;
(7) Establish and maintain policies and procedures for access to
state information;
(8) Establish privacy and quality policies for the protection of
state information in compliance with state and federal laws;
(9) Establish and maintain policies to ensure the security of
state information in accordance with standards developed by the State
Cybersecurity Office; and
(10) Establish and maintain a public portal that will provide a
resident with easy access to data.
(b)(1) The Division of Information Systems shall prescribe a
standardized process to be used for the sharing of data.
(2) Interagency data sharing under this section is not a
disclosure or release under any statutory or administrative law that governs
the state information.
(c) State information may be made available only if doing so does not
violate:
(1) State confidentiality and disclosure laws as they existed on
January 1, 2025; or
(2) Federal confidentiality and disclosure laws as they existed
on January 1, 2025.
(d)(1) Each cabinet-level department shall assign a data steward to
serve as the primary contact between the Division of Information Systems and
the cabinet-level department.
03-06-2025 09:31:43 LGL091

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 HB1548
(2) A data steward under subdivision (d)(1) of this section
shall be responsible for, including without limitation:
(A) Implementing data governance policies in the cabinet-
level department;
(B) Cataloging data;
(C) Approving data usage; and
(D) Coordinating data integration and exchange.
(3) A data steward under this subsection (d) may be assigned at
a department, division, or program level, depending on the level that is most
practical for the cabinet-level department.
(e) The Division of Information Systems shall provide an annual
written report to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and
Information Technology.

/s/S. Meeks





















03-06-2025 09:31:43 LGL091